Missouri, session 2026, SB1707.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 210.115, 210.140, 352.400, and
537.046, RSMo, are repealed and four new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 210.115, 210.140, 352.400,
and 537.046, to read as follows:
210.115. 1. When any physician, medical examiner,
coroner, dentist, chiropractor, optometrist, podiatrist,
resident, intern, nurse, hospital or clinic personnel that
are engaged in the examination, care, treatment or research
of persons, and any other health practitioner, psychologist,
mental health professional, social worker, day care center
worker or other child-care worker, juvenile officer,
probation or parole officer, jail or detention center
personnel, teacher, principal or other school official,
minister, clergy, or religious worker as provided by section
352.400, peace officer or law enforcement official,
volunteer or personnel of a community service program that
offers support services for families in crisis to assist in
the delegation of any powers regarding the care and custody
of a child by a properly executed power of attorney pursuant
to sections 475.600 to 475.604, or other person with
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1707 2
responsibility for the care of children has reasonable cause
to suspect that a child has been or may be subjected to
abuse or neglect or observes a child being subjected to
conditions or circumstances which would reasonably result in
abuse or neglect, that person shall immediately report to
the division in accordance with the provisions of sections
210.109 to 210.183. No internal investigation shall be
initiated until such a report has been made. As used in
this section, the term "abuse" is not limited to abuse
inflicted by a person responsible for the child's care,
custody and control as specified in section 210.110, but
shall also include abuse inflicted by any other person.
2. If two or more members of a medical institution who
are required to report jointly have knowledge of a known or
suspected instance of child abuse or neglect, a single
report may be made by a designated member of that medical
team. Any member who has knowledge that the member
designated to report has failed to do so shall thereafter
immediately make the report. Nothing in this section,
however, is meant to preclude any person from reporting
abuse or neglect.
3. The reporting requirements under this section are
individual, and no supervisor or administrator may impede or
inhibit any reporting under this section. No person making
a report under this section shall be subject to any
sanction, including any adverse employment action, for
making such report. Every employer shall ensure that any
employee required to report pursuant to subsection 1 of this
section has immediate and unrestricted access to
communications technology necessary to make an immediate
report and is temporarily relieved of other work duties for

SB 1707 3
such time as is required to make any report required under
subsection 1 of this section.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of sections
210.109 to 210.183, any child who does not receive specified
medical treatment by reason of the legitimate practice of
the religious belief of the child's parents, guardian, or
others legally responsible for the child, for that reason
alone, shall not be found to be an abused or neglected
child, and such parents, guardian or other persons legally
responsible for the child shall not be entered into the
central registry. However, the division may accept reports
concerning such a child and may subsequently investigate or
conduct a family assessment as a result of that report.
Such an exception shall not limit the administrative or
judicial authority of the state to ensure that medical
services are provided to the child when the child's health
requires it.
5. In addition to those persons and officials required
to report actual or suspected abuse or neglect, any other
person may report in accordance with sections 210.109 to
210.183 if such person has reasonable cause to suspect that
a child has been or may be subjected to abuse or neglect or
observes a child being subjected to conditions or
circumstances which would reasonably result in abuse or
neglect.
6. Any person or official required to report pursuant
to this section, including employees of the division, who
has probable cause to suspect that a child who is or may be
under the age of eighteen, who is eligible to receive a
certificate of live birth, has died shall report that fact
to the appropriate medical examiner or coroner. If, upon
review of the circumstances and medical information, the

SB 1707 4
medical examiner or coroner determines that the child died
of natural causes while under medical care for an
established natural disease, the coroner, medical examiner
or physician shall notify the division of the child's death
and that the child's attending physician shall be signing
the death certificate. In all other cases, the medical
examiner or coroner shall accept the report for
investigation, shall immediately notify the division of the
child's death as required in section 58.452 and shall report
the findings to the child fatality review panel established
pursuant to section 210.192.
7. Any person or individual required to report may
also report the suspicion of abuse or neglect to any law
enforcement agency or juvenile office. Such report shall
not, however, take the place of reporting to the division.
8. If an individual required to report suspected
instances of abuse or neglect pursuant to this section has
reason to believe that the victim of such abuse or neglect
is a resident of another state or was injured as a result of
an act which occurred in another state, the person required
100 to report such abuse or neglect may, in lieu of reporting to
101 the Missouri children's division, make such a report to the
102 child protection agency of the other state with the
103 authority to receive such reports pursuant to the laws of
104 such other state. If such agency accepts the report, no
105 report is required to be made, but may be made, to the
106 children's division.
107 9. For the purposes of providing supportive services
108 or verifying the status of a youth as unaccompanied or
109 homeless for the purposes of accessing supportive services,
110 the fact that a child is an unaccompanied youth as defined
111 in 42 U.S.C. Section 11434a(6) is not, in and of itself, a

SB 1707 5
112 sufficient basis for reporting child abuse or neglect,
113 unless the child is under sixteen years of age or is an
114 incapacitated person, as defined in section 475.010.
115 Nothing in this subsection shall limit a mandated reporter
116 from making a report under this section if the mandated
117 reporter knows or has reasonable cause to suspect that an
118 unaccompanied youth has been or may be a victim of abuse or
119 neglect.
120 10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
121 contrary, a minister or designated agent shall report
122 suspected child abuse or neglect as required under
123 subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of section 352.400 when such
124 report concerns a privileged communication made to him or
125 her in his or her professional capacity.
210.140. 1. Any legally recognized privileged
communication, except that between attorney and client [or
involving communications made to a minister or
clergyperson], shall not apply to situations involving known
or suspected child abuse or neglect and shall not constitute
grounds for failure to report as required or permitted by
sections 210.110 to 210.165, to cooperate with the division
in any of its activities pursuant to sections 210.110 to
210.165, or to give or accept evidence in any judicial
proceeding relating to child abuse or neglect.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, a minister or designated agent shall report
suspected child abuse or neglect as required under
subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of section 352.400 when such
report concerns a privileged communication made to him or
her in his or her professional capacity.
352.400. 1. As used in this section, the following
words and phrases shall mean:

SB 1707 6
(1) "Abuse", any physical injury, sexual abuse, or
emotional abuse, injury or harm to a child under
circumstances required to be reported pursuant to sections
210.109 to 210.183;
(2) "Child", any person regardless of physical or
mental condition, under eighteen years of age;
(3) "Minister", any person while practicing as a
minister of the gospel, clergyperson, priest, rabbi,
Christian Science practitioner, or other person serving in a
similar capacity for any religious organization who is
responsible for or who has supervisory authority over one
who is responsible for the care, custody, and control of a
child or has access to a child;
(4) "Neglect", failure to provide the proper or
necessary support or services by those responsible for the
care, custody, and control of a child, under circumstances
required to be reported pursuant to sections 210.109 to
210.183;
(5) "Religious organization", any society, sect,
persuasion, mission, church, parish, congregation, temple,
convention or association of any of the foregoing, diocese
or presbytery, or other organization, whether or not
incorporated, that meets at more or less regular intervals
for worship of a supreme being or higher power, or for
mutual support or edification in piety or with respect to
the idea that a minimum standard of behavior from the
standpoint of overall morality is to be observed, or for the
sharing of common religious bonds and convictions;
(6) "Report", the communication of an allegation of
abuse or neglect pursuant to sections 210.109 to 210.183.
2. (1) When a minister or agent designated pursuant
to subsection 3 of this section has reasonable cause to

SB 1707 7
suspect that a child has been or may be subjected to abuse
or neglect under circumstances required to be reported
pursuant to sections 210.109 to 210.183, the minister or
designated agent shall immediately report or cause a report
to be made as provided in sections 210.109 to 210.183.
[Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or
sections 210.109 to 210.183, a minister shall not be
required to report concerning a privileged communication
made to him or her in his or her professional capacity.]
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, a minister or designated agent pursuant to
subsection 3 of this section shall be required to report or
cause a report to be made pursuant to sections 210.109 to
210.183 concerning privileged communication made to him or
her in his or her professional capacity regarding child
abuse or neglect.
3. A religious organization may designate an agent or
agents required to report pursuant to sections 210.109 to
210.183 in an official capacity on behalf of the religious
organization. In the event a minister, official or staff
member of a religious organization has probable cause to
believe that the child has been subjected to abuse or
neglect under circumstances required to be reported pursuant
to sections 210.109 to 213.183 and the minister, official or
staff member of the religious organization does not
personally make a report pursuant to sections 210.109 to
210.183, the designated agent of the religious organization
shall be notified. The designated agent shall then become
responsible for making or causing the report to be made
pursuant to sections 210.109 to 210.183. This section shall
not preclude any person from reporting abuse or neglect as
otherwise provided by law.

SB 1707 8
537.046. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Childhood sexual abuse", any act committed by the
defendant, or an act committed by an individual if the
defendant's tortious conduct causes such act to occur,
against the plaintiff which act occurred when the plaintiff
was under the age of eighteen years and which act would have
been a violation of section 566.030, 566.031, 566.032,
566.034, 566.060, 566.061, 566.062, 566.064, 566.067,
566.068, 566.069, 566.071, 566.083, 566.086, 566.093,
566.095, 566.100, 566.101, 566.209, 566.210, 566.211,
568.020, or 573.200;
(2) "Injury" or "illness", either a physical injury or
illness or a psychological injury or illness. A
psychological injury or illness need not be accompanied by
physical injury or illness.
2. Any action against any party to recover damages
from injury or illness caused by childhood sexual abuse or
tortious conduct that causes a victim to be a victim of
childhood sexual abuse in an action brought pursuant to this
section [shall be commenced within ten years of the
plaintiff attaining the age of twenty-one or within three
years of the date the plaintiff discovers, or reasonably
should have discovered, that the injury or illness was
caused by childhood sexual abuse, whichever later occurs]
may be commenced at any time.
3. This section shall apply to any action arising on
or after August 28, 2025.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, a nondisclosure agreement by any party to a
childhood sexual abuse action shall not be judicially

SB 1707 9
enforceable in a dispute involving childhood sexual abuse
allegations or claims, and shall be void.
✓